Washington statutes.
RCW 18.96.060

Board—Adoption of rules—Executive director.

(1) The board may adopt such rules under chapter 34.05 RCW as are necessary for the proper performance of its duties under this chapter.

(2) The director may employ an executive director subject to approval of the board.

[ 2009 c 370 s 6; 2002 c 86 s 234; 1969 ex.s. c 158 s 6.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2009 c 370 ss 1-16, 18, 20, and 21: See note following RCW 18.96.010.

Finding—2009 c 370: See note following RCW 18.96.010.

Effective dates—2002 c 86: See note following RCW 18.08.340.

Part headings not law—Severability—2002 c 86: See RCW 18.235.902 and 18.235.903.